Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB108.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Real Property Emergency Services Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Accessory equipment." Firefighting and rescue equipment necessary to carry out the ordinary functions of supporting fire and rescue activities."Apparatus equipment." Elevated equipment, pumpers, tankers, ladder trucks, utility or special services vehicles, rescue vehicles or other large equipment used by firefighters.1234567891011121314151617 "Communications equipment." A voice or original transmission system required to support the operation of a fire company or for emergency medical services."Firehouse." As follows:(1) A facility used by a fire company to house firefighting equipment.(2) The term does not include meeting halls, social rooms or any other facilities not directly relating to firefighting."Fund." A real property emergency services fund established by a municipality under section 3(a)."Municipality." Any of the following:(1) A city of the first class, second class, second class A or third class.(2) A borough.(3) An incorporated town.(4) A township.(5) A home rule municipality.(6) A similar general purpose unit of government established by the General Assembly."Protective equipment."(1) Equipment used by firefighters to protect firefighters from injury while performing duties, including helmets, turnout coats and pants, boots, eyeshields, gloves and self-contained respiratory protection units.(2) Equipment used by emergency medical technicians, paramedics and other emergency medical response personnel to protect from injury while performing duties, including face masks, face shields, gowns and gloves."Rescue vehicle." A vehicle used for rescue services, 20250HB0108PN0086 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including vehicle rescue or water rescue."Utility or special services vehicle." A vehicle carrying accessory equipment, including ladders, oxygen equipment, generators and adapters, floodlights, smoke ejectors and other equipment necessary to perform the ordinary functions of supporting firefighting activities.Section 3. Real property emergency services funds.(a) Requirements.--Each municipality shall establish a real property emergency services fund.(b) Use of fund.--A municipality shall use money in the fund to supplement a municipal emergency services allocation. The money in the fund may only be expended for:(1) The purchase or maintenance of accessory equipment, apparatus equipment, communications equipment and protective equipment used by volunteer firefighters or firefighters employed by the municipality for firefighting, emergency response services and training purposes.(2) The purchase or maintenance of rescue vehicles or utility or special services vehicles used by volunteer firefighters or firefighters employed by the municipality for firefighting, emergency response services and training purposes.(3) Construction or maintenance of firehouses.(4) Salaries of firefighters who are employed by the municipality.(5) The purchase or maintenance of medical equipment, communications equipment or protective equipment used for emergency medical response services and training purposes by volunteer emergency medical technicians, emergency medical technicians, paramedics and other emergency medical response 20250HB0108PN0086 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 personnel employed by the municipality.(6) The purchase or maintenance of ambulances or other vehicles used for emergency medical response services and training purposes by volunteer emergency medical technicians, emergency medical technicians, paramedics or other emergency medical response personnel employed by the municipality.(7) Construction or maintenance of facilities used for storing or maintaining emergency medical services equipment, including ambulances and other vehicles.(8) Salaries of emergency medical technicians, paramedics or other emergency medical response personnel who are employed by the municipality.(9) Costs incurred by contracting with a third-party entity that provides emergency medical services for the municipality.(c) Fee.--Within 15 days of closing on the sale of real property, the buyer and seller shall each remit a $25 fee to the municipality in which the real property is located. The municipality shall deposit the fee in the municipality's fund. If a parcel of real property is located in multiple municipalities, the fee shall be paid to the municipality where the majority of the real property is located.(d) Penalty.--The municipality described in subsection (c) may impose a $250 penalty on a buyer or seller of real property that fails to remit the fee required under subsection (c). Penalties shall be deposited into the municipality's fund.Section 4. Reporting.Not later than one year after the effective date of this section and annually thereafter, each municipality shall publish a report detailing the allocations from the municipality's fund 20250HB0108PN0086 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and how the allocations were used. The report shall be made available to the public.Section 5. Auditing.At least once every five years, each municipality shall audit or hire a third-party firm to conduct an audit of the municipality's fund.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0108PN0086 - 5 - 12345678